Maryland, session 2026, HB1566.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Real Property
7–103.
(a) (1) THIS SUBSECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO A DEED OF TRUST.
(2) The title to any promissory note, other instrument, or debt secured by
a mortgage, both before and after the maturity of the note, other instrument, or debt,
conclusively is presumed to be vested in the person holding the record title to the mortgage.
If the mortgage is duly released of record, the promissory note, other instrument, or debt
secured by the mortgage, both before and after the maturity of the promissory note, other
instrument, or debt, conclusively is presumed to be paid as far as any lien on the property
granted by the mortgage is concerned.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1566*

HOUSE BILL 1566
[(b)] (3) After an assignment of a mortgage is recorded, any payment made by
the original mortgagor to the assignor is effective to reduce or discharge the note or debt,
unless the mortgagor has received actual notice of the assignment prior to the payment.
This provision also applies to a payment by a transferee of the mortgagor’s interest in the
mortgaged property except where the assignment of the mortgage is of record at the
effective date of the transfer of the mortgagor’s interest in the mortgaged property.
(B) WHEN A DEED OF TRUST IS RECORDED TO SECURE A PROMISSORY NOTE,
OTHER INSTRUMENT, OR OTHER OBLIGATION, THE HOLDER OF THE PROMISSORY
NOTE, OTHER INSTRUMENT, OR OTHER OBLIGATION SECURED BY THE DEED OF
TRUST IS ENTITLED TO THE BENEFITS OF THE DEED OF TRUST NOTWITHSTANDING
ANY PERSON RECORDED IN THE LAND RECORDS AS THE HOLDER.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.